District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

21-1108

Dismissal and discharge, or placement in Forest Haven; controlling considerations

Repealed.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-137, § 604a1, 25 DCR 5094

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., §§ 21-1102 to 21-1108A.